Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.190

Decertification.

(1) The secretary of state may decertify a voting system or any component of a voting system and withdraw authority for its future use or sale in the state if, at any time after certification, the secretary of state determines that:

(a) The system or component fails to meet the standards set forth in applicable federal guidelines;

(b) The system or component was materially misrepresented in the certification application;

(c) The applicant has installed unauthorized modifications to the certified software or hardware; or

(d) Any other reason authorized by rule adopted by the secretary of state.

(2) The secretary of state may decertify a voting system or any component of a voting system and withdraw authority for its future use or sale in the state if the manufacturer or distributor of the voting system or component thereof fails to comply with the notification requirements of RCW 29A.12.180.

[ 2018 c 218 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2018 c 218: See note following RCW 29A.60.185.